Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1009.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 35 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER B.1SHARED LOW-SPEED ELECTRIC SCOOTERSSec.3531. Definitions.3532. Oversight.3533. Shared low-speed electric scooter program.3534. Insurance.3535. Safety issues.3536. Labor peace agreements.3537. Enforcement.3538. Police powers.123456789101112131415161718 3539. Reports.3540. Applicability and construction.§ 3531. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandoned shared low-speed electric scooter." A shared low-speed electric scooter that meets all of the following:(1) The user of the shared low-speed electric scooter is not visible to an individual making an initial report on a hotline that the shared low-speed electric scooter is abandoned.(2) The shared low-speed electric scooter is illegally parked on a highway or is on property where the shared low-speed electric scooter is prohibited to be used or kept under this subchapter or an applicable municipal ordinance or executive order."Authorized municipality." Any of the following:(1) A city of the second class.(2) A city of the second class A.(3) A city of the third class."Commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise." A person that makes shared low-speed electric scooters available for rent to the public for use under a program."Hotline." A complaint hotline established under section 3533(b)(2) (relating to shared low-speed electric scooter program)."Low-speed electric scooter." As follows:(1) A device weighing less than 100 pounds that:(i) has handlebars and an electric motor;20260SB1009PN1726 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding or a seat on which a person may sit while riding; and(iii) is powered solely by the electric motor or human power, or both.(2) The term does not include a pedalcycle with electric assist, electric personal assistive mobility device, motorcycle, motorized pedalcycle or motor-driven cycle."Program." A shared low-speed electric scooter program authorized under section 3533(a)."Shared low-speed electric scooter." A low-speed electric scooter made available for rent to the public by a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise under a program.§ 3532. Oversight.The department shall have primary responsibility for oversight of all of the following:(1) Shared low-speed electric scooters operating in this Commonwealth.(2) Programs established by authorized municipalities.(3) The adoption by authorized municipalities of required ordinances, amendments to required ordinances and subsequent policies to ensure compliance with this subchapter.§ 3533. Shared low-speed electric scooter program.(a) Authorization.--An authorized municipality may establish a shared low-speed electric scooter program with a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise within the boundaries of the authorized municipality in accordance with this subchapter.(b) Ordinance.--Before establishing a program, an authorized 20260SB1009PN1726 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality shall adopt an ordinance that includes all of the following:(1) Policies providing all of the following:(i) An individual operating a shared low-speed electric scooter under a program shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the operator of a pedalcycle under Subchapter A (relating to operation of pedalcycles).(ii) A shared low-speed electric scooter may operate on a highway, pedalcycle lane on a highway or pedalcycle path owned by the Commonwealth or an authorized municipality within the boundaries of the authorized municipality.(iii) Subject to subparagraph (iv)(C), an individual may not operate a shared low-speed electric scooter on a sidewalk unless the shared low-speed electric scooter is upright and properly docked in a designated parking area as determined by the authorized municipality.(iv) An individual may not operate a shared low-speed electric scooter on any of the following:(A) A freeway.(B) A highway with a posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour or more.(C) A sidewalk in a business district.(v) An individual under 16 years of age may not operate a shared low-speed electric scooter.(vi) An individual may not operate a shared low-speed electric scooter at a speed greater than 15 miles per hour.(vii) When operated between sunset and sunrise, a 20260SB1009PN1726 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shared low-speed electric scooter shall be equipped with all of the following:(A) A lamp on the front that emits a beam of white light intended to illuminate the path of the shared low-speed electric scooter and is visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the front.(B) A red lamp facing to the rear that is visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the rear.(C) A reflector on each side.(viii) A commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise shall provide information on customer support service for approval by the authorized municipality.(2) Provisions establishing a complaint hotline in accordance with all of the following:(i) The hotline shall be used to report any of the following:(A) Abandoned shared low-speed electric scooters.(B) Violations of this subchapter or the ordinance.(ii) The hotline telephone number shall be displayed on each shared low-speed electric scooter.(iii) The hotline may operate through an existing municipal response center operated by the authorized municipality.(3) Requirements addressing all of the following:(i) Geofencing.(ii) Rider limits.20260SB1009PN1726 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Fleet size.(iv) Vehicle maintenance information.(v) Strategies to reduce negative interactions between riders of shared low-speed electric scooters and pedestrians.(vi) Installation and maintenance of parking and charging stations.(vii) Data management and reporting.(viii) Education, public awareness and public participation plans.(ix) Fare structure.(c) Amendments and policy changes.--An authorized municipality may amend an ordinance adopted under subsection (b) or adopt a subsequent policy consistent with this subchapter to improve operation of the program or further protect public safety.(d) Notice.--An authorized municipality that adopts an ordinance under subsection (b) or an amendment or policy under subsection (c) shall notify the department of the adoption.§ 3534. Insurance.(a) Requirement.--A commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise operating in an authorized municipality shall provide the authorized municipality with proof of insurance coverage required under this section.(b) Coverage amounts.--A commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise shall maintain all of the following insurance coverage:(1) Commercial general liability insurance with a limit of at least $2,000,000 for each occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate.20260SB1009PN1726 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Automobile insurance with a limit of at least $1,000,000 for each occurrence and $1,000,000 in the aggregate.(3) If the commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise employs an individual, workers' compensation coverage in an amount not less than required by Federal or State law.§ 3535. Safety issues.If a program includes the use of a highway owned by or under the jurisdiction of the department, the department may permanently or temporarily restrict access to a segment of the highway under the program if the department identifies a pattern of safety issues that cannot be reasonably corrected. The department shall establish a process to:(1) Examine the safety issue, including evaluation of accidents and damage to property on the highway.(2) Communicate the safety issue to, and consult with, the authorized municipality and commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise before restricting access.§ 3536. Labor peace agreements.(a) Agreement required.--To ensure uninterrupted service and minimize labor disputes, an operator or service provider of shared low-speed electric scooters shall present a fully executed labor peace agreement with a labor organization representing the operator's or service provider's employees as part of the operator's or service provider's license application or within 90 days after being informed of the representation if the employees were not previously represented by the labor organization.(b) Availability.--A labor peace agreement shall be made 20260SB1009PN1726 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available upon request.(c) Labor disputes.--In the event of a labor dispute, an operator or service provider of shared low-speed electric scooters shall take all reasonable steps to maintain service levels and minimize the impact on the public.§ 3537. Enforcement.In addition to a fine or penalty relating to a pedalcycle under Subchapter A (relating to operation of pedalcycles), an authorized municipality may impose one or more of the following:(1) A fine of not more than $50 for failure to operate a shared low-speed electric scooter in compliance with this subchapter.(2) A fine of not more than $150 for failure to park a shared low-speed electric scooter in compliance with this subchapter.(3) A fine of not more than $150 per day on a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise for each abandoned shared low-speed electric scooter that is not collected and returned to a corral or storage area within three hours after the shared low-speed electric scooter is abandoned.(4) A civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day that a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise operates without the insurance required under section 3534 (relating to insurance). A civil penalty collected under this paragraph shall be used by the authorized municipality for the safety, operation and management of shared low-speed electric scooters or pedalcycles.§ 3538. Police powers.20260SB1009PN1726 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to do either of the following:(1) Limit the reasonable exercise of police power to regulate and enforce the use of shared low-speed electric scooters in accordance with this subchapter and the regulation of pedalcycles, as applicable.(2) Prevent the department, on a State-designated highway, or a local authority, on a local-designated highway, from reasonably exercising police powers in accordance with section 6109 (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities).§ 3539. Reports.(a) Requirement.--Each authorized municipality that establishes a program, in coordination with the department, shall prepare an annual report on the deployment of shared low-speed electric scooters under the program.(b) Contents.--A report under this section shall include all of the following:(1) The number of rides.(2) The number of accidents.(3) The frequency of use.(4) An ordinance, regulation or policy adopted in accordance with this subchapter.(c) Submission.--A report under this section shall be submitted to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Posting.--The department and the authorized municipality 20260SB1009PN1726 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall post the report on their publicly accessible Internet websites.§ 3540. Applicability and construction.(a) Certificate of title and registration.--Notwithstanding Subchapter A of Chapter 11 (relating to certificate of title) or Subchapter A of Chapter 13 (relating to general provisions), a shared low-speed electric scooter authorized under this subchapter shall not be subject to the certificate of title or vehicle registration requirements under this title.(b) Motor vehicle.--A shared low-speed electric scooter authorized under this subchapter shall not be construed to be a motor vehicle.(c) Private ownership.--Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit a person that is not a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise from owning or operating a low-speed electric scooter. The person shall not be subject to a requirement under this subchapter that applies specifically to a commercial shared low-speed electric scooter enterprise.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For an authorized municipality that is a city of the second class, the addition of 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 Subch. B.1 shall apply immediately.(2) For an authorized municipality that is a city of the second class A or a city of the third class, the addition of 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 Subch. B.1 shall apply 60 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1009PN1726 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627